Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2299.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "oral communication" in section 5702 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes, amended November 24, 2025 (P.L.326, No.53), is amended to read:§ 5702. Definitions.As used in this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Oral communication." Any oral communication uttered by a person possessing an expectation that such communication is not subject to interception under circumstances justifying such expectation. The term does not include the following:12345678910111213141516171819 (1) An electronic communication.(2) A communication made in the presence of a law enforcement officer on official duty who is in uniform or otherwise clearly identifiable as a law enforcement officer and who is using an electronic, mechanical or other device which has been approved under section 5706(b)(4) (relating to exceptions to prohibitions in possession, sale, distribution, manufacture or advertisement of electronic, mechanical or other devices) to intercept the communication in the course of law enforcement duties. As used in this paragraph only, "law enforcement officer" means any of the following:(i) A member of the Pennsylvania State Police.(ii) An individual employed as a police officer who holds a current certificate under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 21 Subch. D (relating to municipal police education and training).(iii) An agent of the Office of Attorney General as described under paragraph (2) of the definition of "enforcement officer" in 71 Pa.C.S. § 5102 (relating to definitions).(iv) A sheriff or a deputy sheriff.(v) Waterways conservation officers or deputy waterways conservation officers as the terms are defined under 30 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions).(vi) An officer as defined under 34 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions).(vii) An individual employed by the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources who is vested with powers of arrest under section 302(c) or 303(a)(7) of the act of June 28, 1995 (P.L.89, No.18), known as the 20260HB2299PN3019 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Conservation and Natural Resources Act.(viii) An agent as defined in 61 Pa.C.S. § 6101 (relating to definitions).(ix) An individual employed by the Department of Corrections Bureau of Investigations and Intelligence holding a police officer commission under the act of May 21, 1943 (P.L.469, No.210), entitled "An act providing for commissioning as police officers certain employes of institutions maintained in whole or in part by the Commonwealth; conferring upon them the powers of constables in certain cases; and imposing duties on wardens and keepers of jails, police stations and lock-ups," provided that the individual is not intercepting the communication from inside the residence of an employee of the Department of Corrections without the consent of the employee or prior court approval.(x) An officer as defined under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9911 (relating to definitions).* * *Section 2. The definition of "law enforcement officer" in section 67A01 of Title 42 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 67A01. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Law enforcement officer." Any of the following:* * *(10) An officer as defined under section 9911 (relating 20260HB2299PN3019 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to definitions).* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2299PN3019 - 4 - 123